Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2212
Pledge or security agreement; lien on funds.

Any pledge or security instrument made by the commission shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge or security instrument is made. The money in the fund, the State Highway Capital Improvement Fund, or the bond fund so pledged and entrusted shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge or security instrument upon the deposit thereof in the fund without any physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of any such pledge or security instrument shall be valid and binding as against all parties having subsequently arising claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any security instrument or other instrument by which a pledge or other security is created need be recorded or filed and the commission shall not be required to comply with any of the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 12, p. 1111;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 35.